California, session 20252026, SB799.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6539.9 of the Government Code is amended to read:6539.9. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Los Angeles and any or all of the cities within the jurisdiction of the South Bay Cities Council of Governments may enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to this chapter to create and operate a joint powers agency to fund housing to assist the homeless population and persons and families of extremely low, very low, and low low, and moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, within the South Bay Cities region.(2) The joint powers agency created pursuant to this section shall be known as the South Bay Regional Housing Trust and shall operate in accordance with this section.(b) (1) The South Bay Regional Housing Trust shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of an appropriate number of directors to be established by its joint powers agreement.(2) (A) The board of directors shall be appointed in accordance with a process established by its joint powers agreement and shall include mayors, council members, or County of Los Angeles supervisors that represent either of the following:(i) A city that is a party to the joint powers agreement.(ii) A County of Los Angeles Board of Supervisors district that is located wholly or partially within the territory of the South Bay Cities Council of Governments, if the county is a party to the joint powers agreement.(B) Two members of the board of directors shall be experts in homelessness or housing policy.(C) (i) The board of directors may include persons appointed and designated as alternate members of the board of directors. (ii) The persons appointed and designated as the alternate members of the board of directors may include any of the following: (I) An elected or appointed member of the governing body of the party to the joint powers agreement.(II) An appointed member of an advisory body of the party to the joint powers agreement. (III) A staff member of the party to the joint powers agreement.(IV) A member of the public who is an expert in homelessness or housing policy. (D) All directors and alternates shall be subject to the board of directors’ adopted conflict of interest code. (E) Each alternate that is currently not an elected official shall not participate as a voting member in more than 75 percent of all meetings in a calendar year.(3) The board of directors shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from among its members at the first meeting held in either the calendar or fiscal year.(4) (A) Members of the board of directors shall serve without compensation.(B) Members of the board of directors may be reimbursed for actual expenses subject to the approval of the governing board of the South Bay Regional Housing Trust. Actual expenses shall be approved before they are incurred.(5) The joint powers agreement shall establish the process for appointing a qualified individual to fill a vacancy within 60 days of the vacancy, if a vacancy occurs on the board of directors. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, the South Bay Regional Housing Trust may do any of the following:(1) (A) Fund the planning and construction planning, construction, and preservation of housing of all types and tenures for the homeless population and persons and families of extremely low, very low, and low income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, permanent supportive housing.(B) Fund the planning and construction of housing of all types and tenures for persons and families of moderate income using any private resources available to the South Bay Regional Housing Trust.(2) Receive public and private financing and funds.(3) Authorize and issue bonds, certificates of participation, or any other debt instrument repayable from funds and financing received pursuant to paragraph (2) and pledged by the South Bay Regional Housing Trust.(d) The South Bay Regional Housing Trust shall incorporate into its joint powers agreement annual financial reporting and auditing requirements that shall maximize transparency and public information as to the receipt and use of funds by the agency. The annual financial report shall show how the funds have furthered the purposes of the South Bay Regional Housing Trust.(e) The South Bay Regional Housing Trust shall comply with the regulatory guidelines of each specific state funding source received.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the following unique circumstances in the South Bay Cities region of the County of Los Angeles:(a) California has an affordable housing crisis, which is especially acute in the South Bay Cities region of the County of Los Angeles due to the high cost of housing in that area, even in formerly affordable communities.(b) The establishment of the South Bay Regional Housing Trust to receive available public and private funds could help finance affordable housing projects for homeless and low-income homeless, low-income, and moderate-income populations.